Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-308
Employment certificate; evening school; attendance record.

Regular attendance of a child at any public evening school, maintained in any city or village when instruction is given not less than twenty weeks each year, three evenings each week, and two hours each evening, shall authorize the issuance of a certificate of employment when the schooling certificate fails to show that the child has completed the work of the sixth grade if the schooling certificate and all other certificates are otherwise in due form and the applicant further produces a certificate from the superintendent or principal of such public evening school showing the regular attendance of such child at such evening school and if the child employed under such certificate furnishes to his or her employer a weekly certificate showing regular attendance each week while the evening school is in session.

Laws 1907, c. 66, § 8, p. 262;

R.S.1913, § 3582;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. III, § 8, p. 553;

C.S.1922, § 7676;

C.S.1929, § 48-308;

R.S.1943, § 48-308;

Laws 1967, c. 296, § 5, p. 807;

Laws 1987, LB 35, § 4.